Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2610
License; renewal; statement as to use of pharmaceutical agents.

In issuing a license or renewal, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall state whether such person licensed in the practice of optometry has been certified to use pharmaceutical agents pursuant to section 38-2613, 38-2614, or 38-2615 and shall determine an appropriate means to further identify those persons who are certified in the diagnostic use of such agents or the therapeutic use of such agents.

Laws 1979, LB 9, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 131, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 429, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 369, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 98;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,135.04;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 882.